Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF131.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 243.166, subdivision 1b, is amended to read: Subd. 1b. Registration required. (a) A person shall register under this section if: (1) the person was charged with or petitioned for a felony violation of or attempt to violate, or aiding, abetting, or conspiracy to commit, any of the following, and convicted of or adjudicated delinquent for that offense or another offense arising out of the same set of circumstances: (i) murder under section 609.185, paragraph (a), clause (2); (ii) kidnapping under section 609.25; (iii) criminal sexual conduct under section 609.342; 609.343; 609.344; 609.345; 609.3451, subdivision 3, paragraph (b); or 609.3453; (iv) indecent exposure under section 617.23, subdivision 3; or (v) surreptitious intrusion under the circumstances described in section 609.746, subdivision 1, paragraph (h); (2) the person was charged with or petitioned for a violation of, or attempt to violate, or aiding, abetting, or conspiring to commit any of the following and convicted of or adjudicated delinquent for that offense or another offense arising out of the same set of circumstances: (i) criminal abuse in violation of Minnesota Statutes 2020, section 609.2325, subdivision 1, paragraph (b); (ii) solicitation, inducement, or promotion of the prostitution of a minor or engaging in the sex trafficking of a minor in violation of section 609.322; (iii) a prostitution offense in violation of section 609.324, subdivision 1, paragraph (a); (iv) soliciting a minor to engage in sexual conduct in violation of section 609.352, subdivision 2 or 2a, clause (1); (v) using a minor in a sexual performance in violation of section 617.246; or (vi) possessing or disseminating a pornographic work involving a minor in violation of section 617.247; (3) the person was sentenced as a patterned sex offender under section 609.3455, subdivision 3a; or (4) the person was charged with or petitioned for, including pursuant to a court martial, violating a law of the United States, including the Uniform Code of Military Justice, similar to an offense or involving similar circumstances to an offense described in clause (1), (2), or (3), and convicted of or adjudicated delinquent for that offense or another offense arising out of the same set of circumstances. (b) A person also shall register under this section if: (1) the person was charged with or petitioned for an offense in another state similar to an offense or involving similar circumstances to an offense described in paragraph (a), clause (1), (2), or (3), and convicted of or adjudicated delinquent for that offense or another offense arising out of the same set of circumstances; (2) the person enters this state to reside, work, or attend school, or enters this state and remains for 14 days or longer or for an aggregate period of time exceeding 30 days during any calendar year; and (3) ten years have not elapsed since the person was released from confinement or, if the person was not confined, since the person was convicted of or adjudicated delinquent for the offense that triggers registration, unless the person is subject to a longer registration period under the laws of another state in which the person has been convicted or adjudicated, or is subject to lifetime registration. If a person described in this paragraph is subject to a longer registration period in another state or is subject to lifetime registration, the person shall register for that time period regardless of when the person was released from confinement, convicted, or adjudicated delinquent. (c) A person also shall register under this section if the person was committed pursuant to a court commitment order under Minnesota Statutes 2012, section 253B.185, chapter 253D, Minnesota Statutes 1992, section 526.10, or a similar law of another state or the United States, regardless of whether the person was convicted of any offense. (d) A person also shall register under this section if: (1) the person was charged with or petitioned for a felony violation or attempt to violate any of the offenses listed in paragraph (a), clause (1), or a similar law of another state or the United States, or the person was charged with or petitioned for a violation of any of the offenses listed in paragraph (a), clause (2), or a similar law of another state or the United States; (2) the person was found not guilty by reason of mental illness or mental deficiency after a trial for that offense, or found guilty but mentally ill after a trial for that offense, in states with a guilty but mentally ill verdict; and (3) the person was committed pursuant to a court commitment order under section 253B.18 or a similar law of another state or the United States. new text begin (e) A person also shall register under this section if the person received a stay of adjudication under section 609.095, paragraph (b), for a charge of violating section 243.166; 609.342; 609.343; 609.344; 609.345; 609.3451, subdivision 3; 609.3453; 617.246; or 617.247, unless the offender is a juvenile and the court finds, on the record, that there is good cause to waive the registration requirement. new text end